Florida, session 2026, HB521.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
20
21 Section 1. Sections 316.0083 and 321.50, Florida Statutes,
22 are repealed.
23 Section 2. Subsection (6) of section 28.37, Florida
24 Statutes, is amended to read:
25 28.37 Fines, fees, service charges, and costs remitted to
Page 1 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
26 the state.—
27 (6) Ten percent of all court-related fines collected by
28 the clerk, except for penalties or fines distributed to counties
29 or municipalities under s. 318.18(16) s. 316.0083(1)(b)3. or s.
30 318.18(16)(a), must be deposited into the fine and forfeiture
31 fund to be used exclusively for clerk court-related functions,
32 as provided in s. 28.35(3)(a).
33 Section 3. Subsections (38) and (101) of section 316.003,
34 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
35 316.003 Definitions.—The following words and phrases, when
36 used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively
37 ascribed to them in this section, except where the context
38 otherwise requires:
39 (38) LOCAL HEARING OFFICER.—The person, designated by a
40 department, county, or municipality that elects to authorize
41 traffic infraction enforcement officers to issue traffic
42 citations under s. 316.1896(1) ss. 316.0083(1)(a) and
43 316.1896(1), who is authorized to conduct hearings related to a
44 notice of violation issued pursuant to s. 316.0083 or s.
45 316.1896. The charter county, noncharter county, or municipality
46 may use its currently appointed code enforcement board or
47 special magistrate to serve as the local hearing officer. The
48 department may enter into an interlocal agreement to use the
49 local hearing officer of a county or municipality.
50 (101) TRAFFIC INFRACTION DETECTOR.—A vehicle sensor
Page 2 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
51 installed to work in conjunction with a traffic control signal
52 and a camera or cameras synchronized to automatically record two
53 or more sequenced photographic or electronic images or streaming
54 video of only the rear of a motor vehicle at the time the
55 vehicle fails to stop behind the stop bar or clearly marked stop
56 line when facing a traffic control signal steady red light. Any
57 notification under s. 316.0083(1)(b) or traffic citation issued
58 by the use of a traffic infraction detector must include a
59 photograph or other recorded image showing both the license tag
60 of the offending vehicle and the traffic control device being
61 violated.
62 Section 4. Subsection (8) of section 316.008, Florida
63 Statutes, is amended to read:
64 316.008 Powers of local authorities.—
65 (8)(a) A county or municipality may use traffic infraction
66 detectors to enforce s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. when a
67 driver fails to stop at a traffic signal on streets and highways
68 under its jurisdiction under s. 316.0083. Only a municipality
69 may install or authorize the installation of any such detectors
70 within the incorporated area of the municipality. Only a county
71 may install or authorize the installation of any such detectors
72 within the unincorporated area of the county.
73 (b) Pursuant to paragraph (a), a municipality may install
74 or, by contract or interlocal agreement, authorize the
75 installation of any such detectors only within the incorporated
Page 3 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
76 area of the municipality, and a county may install or, by
77 contract or interlocal agreement, authorize the installation of
78 any such detectors only within the unincorporated area of the
79 county. A county may authorize installation of any such
80 detectors by interlocal agreement on roads under its
81 jurisdiction.
82 (c) Pursuant to s. 316.0083, A county or municipality may
83 use traffic infraction detectors to enforce s. 316.074(1) or s.
84 316.075(1)(c)1. when a driver fails to stop at a traffic signal
85 on state roads under the original jurisdiction of the Department
86 of Transportation when permitted by the Department of
87 Transportation.
88 (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county
89 or municipality may issue a fine for a violation of s.
90 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. detected through the use of a
91 traffic infraction detector. The fine must be accompanied by a
92 photograph or other recorded image showing both the license tag
93 of the offending vehicle and the traffic control device being
94 violated.
95 Section 5. Section 316.00831, Florida Statutes, is
96 repealed.
97 Section 6. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section
98 316.173, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
99 316.173 School bus infraction detection systems.—
100 (6)
Page 4 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
101 (b) Procedures for an administrative hearing conducted
102 under this subsection are as follows:
103 1. The department shall make available electronically to
104 the school district or its designee or the county a Request for
105 Hearing form to assist each district or county with
106 administering this subsection.
107 2. A person, referred to in this paragraph as the
108 petitioner, who elects to request a hearing under this
109 subsection shall be scheduled for a hearing. The hearing may be
110 conducted either virtually via live video conferencing or in
111 person.
112 3. Within 120 days after receipt of a timely request for a
113 hearing, the law enforcement agency or its designee shall
114 provide a replica of the notice of violation data to the school
115 district or county by manual or electronic transmission, and
116 thereafter the school district or its designee or the county
117 shall mail a notice of hearing, which shall include a hearing
118 date and may at the discretion of the district or county include
119 virtual and in-person hearing options, to the petitioner by
120 first-class mail. Mailing of the notice of hearing constitutes
121 notification. Upon receipt of the notice of hearing, the
122 petitioner may reschedule the hearing once by submitting a
123 written request to the local hearing officer at least 5 calendar
124 days before the day of the originally scheduled hearing. The
125 petitioner may cancel his or her hearing by paying the penalty
Page 5 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
126 assessed in the notice of violation.
127 4. All testimony at the hearing shall be under oath. The
128 local hearing officer shall take testimony from the law
129 enforcement agency and the petitioner, and may take testimony
130 from others. The local hearing officer shall review the video
131 and images recorded by a school bus infraction detection system.
132 Formal rules of evidence do not apply, but due process shall be
133 observed and govern the proceedings.
134 5. At the conclusion of the hearing, the local hearing
135 officer shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence
136 whether a violation has occurred and shall uphold or dismiss the
137 violation. The local hearing officer shall issue a final
138 administrative order including the determination and, if the
139 notice of violation is upheld, require the petitioner to pay the
140 civil penalty previously assessed in the notice of violation,
141 and shall also require the petitioner to pay costs, not to
142 exceed those established in s. 316.0083(5)(e), to be used by the
143 county for operational costs relating to the hearing process or
144 by the school district for technology and operational costs
145 relating to the hearing process as well as school transportation
146 safety-related initiatives. The final administrative order shall
147 be mailed to the petitioner by first-class mail.
148 6. An aggrieved party may appeal a final administrative
149 order consistent with the process provided in s. 162.11.
150 Section 7. Subsection (14) of section 316.1896, Florida
Page 6 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
151 Statutes, is amended to read:
152 316.1896 Roadways maintained as school zones; speed
153 detection system enforcement; penalties; appeal procedure;
154 privacy; reports.—
155 (14) A hearing under this section must be conducted under
156 the procedures established by s. 316.0083(5) and as follows:
157 (a) The department must publish and make available
158 electronically to each county and municipality a model request
159 for hearing form to assist each county or municipality
160 administering this section.
161 (b) A county or municipality electing to authorize traffic
162 infraction enforcement officers to issue uniform traffic
163 citations under subsection (6) must designate by resolution
164 existing staff to serve as the clerk to the local hearing
165 officer.
166 (c) A person, referred to in this subsection as the
167 "petitioner," who elects to request a hearing under subsection
168 (3) must be scheduled for a hearing by the clerk to the local
169 hearing officer. The clerk must furnish the petitioner with
170 notice sent by first-class mail. Upon receipt of the notice, the
171 petitioner may reschedule the hearing up to two times by
172 submitting a written request to reschedule to the clerk at least
173 5 calendar days before the day of the scheduled hearing. The
174 petitioner may cancel his or her appearance before the local
175 hearing officer by paying the penalty assessed under subsection
Page 7 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
176 (2), plus the administrative costs established in s.
177 316.0083(5)(c), before the start of the hearing.
178 (d) All testimony at the hearing must be under oath and
179 must be recorded. The local hearing officer must take testimony
180 from a traffic infraction enforcement officer and the petitioner
181 and may take testimony from others. The local hearing officer
182 must review the photograph or video captured by the speed
183 detection system and the evidence of the speed of the motor
184 vehicle detected by the speed detection system made available
185 under paragraph (2)(b). Formal rules of evidence do not apply,
186 but due process must be observed and govern the proceedings.
187 (e) At the conclusion of the hearing, the local hearing
188 officer must determine whether a violation under this section
189 occurred and must uphold or dismiss the violation. The local
190 hearing officer must issue a final administrative order
191 including the determination and, if the notice of violation is
192 upheld, must require the petitioner to pay the penalty
193 previously assessed under subsection (2), and may also require
194 the petitioner to pay county or municipal costs not to exceed
195 the amount established in s. 316.0083(5)(e). The final
196 administrative order must be mailed to the petitioner by first-
197 class mail.
198 (f) An aggrieved party may appeal a final administrative
199 order consistent with the process provided in s. 162.11.
200 Section 8. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and paragraph
Page 8 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
201 (a) of subsection (5) of section 316.640, Florida Statutes, are
202 amended to read:
203 316.640 Enforcement.—The enforcement of the traffic laws
204 of this state is vested as follows:
205 (1) STATE.—
206 (b)1. The Department of Transportation has authority to
207 enforce on all the streets and highways of this state all laws
208 applicable within its authority.
209 2.a. The Department of Transportation shall develop
210 training and qualifications standards for toll enforcement
211 officers whose sole authority is to enforce the payment of tolls
212 pursuant to s. 316.1001. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be
213 construed to permit the carrying of firearms or other weapons,
214 nor shall a toll enforcement officer have arrest authority.
215 b. For the purpose of enforcing s. 316.1001, governmental
216 entities, as defined in s. 334.03, which own or operate a toll
217 facility may employ independent contractors or designate
218 employees as toll enforcement officers; however, any such toll
219 enforcement officer must successfully meet the training and
220 qualifications standards for toll enforcement officers
221 established by the Department of Transportation.
222 3. For the purpose of enforcing s. 316.0083, the
223 department may designate employees as traffic infraction
224 enforcement officers. A traffic infraction enforcement officer
225 must successfully complete instruction in traffic enforcement
Page 9 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
226 procedures and court presentation through the Selective Traffic
227 Enforcement Program as approved by the Division of Criminal
228 Justice Standards and Training of the Department of Law
229 Enforcement, or through a similar program, but may not
230 necessarily otherwise meet the uniform minimum standards
231 established by the Criminal Justice Standards and Training
232 Commission for law enforcement officers or auxiliary law
233 enforcement officers under s. 943.13. This subparagraph does not
234 authorize the carrying of firearms or other weapons by a traffic
235 infraction enforcement officer and does not authorize a traffic
236 infraction enforcement officer to make arrests. The department's
237 traffic infraction enforcement officers must be physically
238 located in the state.
239 (5)(a) Any sheriff's department or police department of a
240 municipality may employ, as a traffic infraction enforcement
241 officer, any individual who successfully completes instruction
242 in traffic enforcement procedures and court presentation through
243 the Selective Traffic Enforcement Program as approved by the
244 Division of Criminal Justice Standards and Training of the
245 Department of Law Enforcement, or through a similar program, but
246 who does not necessarily otherwise meet the uniform minimum
247 standards established by the Criminal Justice Standards and
248 Training Commission for law enforcement officers or auxiliary
249 law enforcement officers under s. 943.13. Any such traffic
250 infraction enforcement officer who observes the commission of a
Page 10 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
251 traffic infraction or, in the case of a parking infraction, who
252 observes an illegally parked vehicle may issue a traffic
253 citation for the infraction when, based upon personal
254 investigation, he or she has reasonable and probable grounds to
255 believe that an offense has been committed which constitutes a
256 noncriminal traffic infraction as defined in s. 318.14. In
257 addition, any such traffic infraction enforcement officer may
258 issue a traffic citation under s. ss. 316.0083 and 316.1896. For
259 purposes of enforcing ss. 316.0083, 316.1895, and 316.183, any
260 sheriff's department or police department of a municipality may
261 designate employees as traffic infraction enforcement officers.
262 The traffic infraction enforcement officers must be physically
263 located in the county of the respective sheriff's or police
264 department.
265 Section 9. Paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (3) of
266 section 316.650, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
267 316.650 Traffic citations.—
268 (3)(a) Except for a traffic citation issued pursuant to s.
269 316.1001, s. 316.0083, s. 316.173, or s. 316.1896, each traffic
270 enforcement officer, upon issuing a traffic citation to an
271 alleged violator of any provision of the motor vehicle laws of
272 this state or of any traffic ordinance of any municipality or
273 town, shall deposit the original traffic citation or, in the
274 case of a traffic enforcement agency that has an automated
275 citation issuance system, the agency shall provide by an
Page 11 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
276 electronic transmission a replica of the citation data to the
277 court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense or with its
278 traffic violations bureau within 5 business days after issuance
279 to the violator.
280 (c) If a traffic citation is issued under s. 316.0083 or
281 s. 316.1896, the traffic infraction enforcement officer shall
282 provide by electronic transmission a replica of the traffic
283 citation data to the court having jurisdiction over the alleged
284 offense or its traffic violations bureau within 5 business days
285 after the date of issuance of the traffic citation to the
286 violator. If a hearing is requested, the traffic infraction
287 enforcement officer shall provide a replica of the traffic
288 notice of violation data to the clerk for the local hearing
289 officer having jurisdiction over the alleged offense within 14
290 days.
291 Section 10. Section 318.121, Florida Statutes, is amended
292 to read:
293 318.121 Preemption of additional fees, fines, surcharges,
294 and costs.—Notwithstanding any general or special law, or
295 municipal or county ordinance, additional fees, fines,
296 surcharges, or costs other than the court costs and surcharges
297 assessed under s. 318.18(12), (14), (19), and (20), and (23) may
298 not be added to the civil traffic penalties assessed under this
299 chapter.
300 Section 11. Subsection (2) of section 318.14, Florida
Page 12 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
301 Statutes, is amended to read:
302 318.14 Noncriminal traffic infractions; exception;
303 procedures.—
304 (2) Except as provided in ss. 316.1001(2), 316.0083,
305 316.173, and 316.1896, any person cited for a violation
306 requiring a mandatory hearing listed in s. 318.19 or any other
307 criminal traffic violation listed in chapter 316 must sign and
308 accept a citation indicating a promise to appear. The officer
309 may indicate on the traffic citation the time and location of
310 the scheduled hearing. The officer must indicate the applicable
311 civil penalty established in s. 318.18, except for infractions
312 under s. 318.19(5) or s. 316.1926(2). For all other infractions
313 under this section, except for infractions under s. 316.1001,
314 the officer must certify by electronic, electronic facsimile, or
315 written signature that the citation was delivered to the person
316 cited. This certification is prima facie evidence that the
317 person cited was served with the citation.
318 Section 12. Subsection (3) of section 318.15, Florida
319 Statutes, is amended to read:
320 318.15 Failure to comply with civil penalty or to appear;
321 penalty.—
322 (3) The clerk shall notify the department of persons who
323 were mailed a notice of violation of s. 316.074(1) or s.
324 316.075(1)(c)1. pursuant to s. 316.0083 and who failed to enter
325 into, or comply with the terms of, a penalty payment plan, or
Page 13 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
326 order with the clerk to the local hearing officer or failed to
327 appear at a scheduled hearing within 10 days after such failure,
328 and shall reference the person's driver license number, or in
329 the case of a business entity, vehicle registration number.
330 (a) Upon receipt of such notice, the department, or
331 authorized agent thereof, may not issue a license plate or
332 revalidation sticker for any motor vehicle owned or co-owned by
333 that person pursuant to s. 320.03(8) until the amounts assessed
334 have been fully paid.
335 (b) After the issuance of the person's license plate or
336 revalidation sticker is withheld pursuant to paragraph (a), the
337 person may challenge the withholding of the license plate or
338 revalidation sticker only on the basis that the outstanding
339 fines and civil penalties have been paid pursuant to s.
340 320.03(8).
341 Section 13. Subsection (24) of section 318.18, Florida
342 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (23), and paragraph (c) of
343 subsection (5), subsection (16), and present subsection (23) of
344 that section are amended to read:
345 318.18 Amount of penalties.—The penalties required for a
346 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal
347 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows:
348 (5)
349 (c)1. In addition to the penalty under subparagraph (a)2.
350 or subparagraph (b)2., if, at an administrative hearing
Page 14 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
351 contesting a notice of violation, the alleged offender is found
352 to have committed this offense, costs shall be imposed, not to
353 exceed those established in s. 316.0083(5)(e), to be paid by the
354 petitioner and to be used by the county for the operational
355 costs related to the hearing or the school district for
356 technology and operational costs relating to the hearing as well
357 as school transportation safety-related initiatives.
358 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a county's local
359 hearing officer administers the administrative hearing process
360 for a contested notice of violation, the costs imposed under
361 this subparagraph resulting from notice of violation shall be
362 remitted to the county at least monthly.
363 2. In addition to the penalty under paragraph (a) or
364 paragraph (b), $65 for a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b).
365 If the alleged offender is found to have committed the offense,
366 the court shall impose the civil penalty under paragraph (a) or
367 paragraph (b) plus an additional $65. The additional $65
368 collected under this subparagraph shall be remitted to the
369 Department of Revenue for deposit into the Emergency Medical
370 Services Trust Fund of the Department of Health to be used as
371 provided in s. 395.4036. If a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or
372 (b) is enforced by a school bus infraction detection system
373 pursuant to s. 316.173, the additional amount imposed on a
374 notice of violation, on a uniform traffic citation, or by the
375 court under this paragraph must be $25, in lieu of the
Page 15 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
376 additional $65, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law,
377 the civil penalties and additional costs must be remitted to the
378 participating school district at least monthly and used pursuant
379 to s. 316.173(8).
380 (16)(a)1. One hundred and fifty-eight dollars for a
381 violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. when a driver
382 has failed to stop at a traffic signal and when enforced by a
383 law enforcement officer. Sixty dollars shall be distributed as
384 provided in s. 318.21, $30 shall be distributed to the General
385 Revenue Fund, $3 shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue
386 for deposit into the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Trust Fund,
387 and the remaining $65 shall be remitted to the Department of
388 Revenue for deposit into the Emergency Medical Services Trust
389 Fund of the Department of Health.
390 2. One hundred and fifty-eight dollars for a violation of
391 s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. when a driver has failed to
392 stop at a traffic signal and when enforced by the department's
393 traffic infraction enforcement officer. One hundred dollars
394 shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into
395 the General Revenue Fund, $45 shall be distributed to the county
396 for any violations occurring in any unincorporated areas of the
397 county or to the municipality for any violations occurring in
398 the incorporated boundaries of the municipality in which the
399 infraction occurred, $10 shall be remitted to the Department of
400 Revenue for deposit into the Department of Health Emergency
Page 16 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
401 Medical Services Trust Fund for distribution as provided in s.
402 395.4036(1), and $3 shall be remitted to the Department of
403 Revenue for deposit into the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Trust
404 Fund.
405 3. One hundred and fifty-eight dollars for a violation of
406 s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. when a driver has failed to
407 stop at a traffic signal and when enforced by a county's or
408 municipality's traffic infraction enforcement officer. Seventy-
409 five dollars shall be distributed to the county or municipality
410 issuing the traffic citation, $70 shall be remitted to the
411 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund,
412 $10 shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit
413 into the Department of Health Emergency Medical Services Trust
414 Fund for distribution as provided in s. 395.4036(1), and $3
415 shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into
416 the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Trust Fund.
417 (b) Amounts deposited into the Brain and Spinal Cord
418 Injury Trust Fund pursuant to this subsection shall be
419 distributed quarterly to the Miami Project to Cure Paralysis and
420 shall be used for brain and spinal cord research.
421 (c) If a person who is mailed a notice of violation or
422 cited for a violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1., as
423 enforced by a traffic infraction enforcement officer under s.
424 316.0083, presents documentation from the appropriate
425 governmental entity that the notice of violation or traffic
Page 17 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
426 citation was in error, the clerk of court or clerk to the local
427 hearing officer may dismiss the case. The clerk of court or
428 clerk to the local hearing officer may not charge for this
429 service.
430 (c)(d) An individual may not receive a commission or per-
431 ticket fee from any revenue collected from violations detected
432 through the use of a traffic infraction detector. A manufacturer
433 or vendor may not receive a fee or remuneration based upon the
434 number of violations detected through the use of a traffic
435 infraction detector.
436 (d)(e) Funds deposited into the Department of Health
437 Emergency Medical Services Trust Fund under this subsection
438 shall be distributed as provided in s. 395.4036(1).
439 (23) In addition to the penalty prescribed under s.
440 316.0083 for violations enforced under s. 316.0083 which are
441 upheld, the local hearing officer may also order the payment of
442 county or municipal costs, not to exceed $250.
443 Section 14. Subsection (8) of section 320.03, Florida
444 Statutes, is amended to read:
445 320.03 Registration; duties of tax collectors;
446 International Registration Plan.—
447 (8) If the applicant's name appears on the list referred
448 to in s. 316.1001(4), s. 316.1967(6), s. 318.15(3), or s.
449 713.78(13), a license plate or revalidation sticker may not be
450 issued until that person's name no longer appears on the list or
Page 18 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
451 until the person presents a receipt from the governmental entity
452 or the clerk of court that provided the data showing that the
453 fines outstanding have been paid. This subsection does not apply
454 to the owner of a leased vehicle if the vehicle is registered in
455 the name of the lessee of the vehicle. The tax collector and the
456 clerk of the court are each entitled to receive monthly, as
457 costs for implementing and administering this subsection, 10
458 percent of the civil penalties and fines recovered from such
459 persons. As used in this subsection, the term "civil penalties
460 and fines" does not include a wrecker operator's lien as
461 described in s. 713.78(13). If the tax collector has private tag
462 agents, such tag agents are entitled to receive a pro rata share
463 of the amount paid to the tax collector, based upon the
464 percentage of license plates and revalidation stickers issued by
465 the tag agent compared to the total issued within the county.
466 The authority of any private agent to issue license plates shall
467 be revoked, after notice and a hearing as provided in chapter
468 120, if he or she issues any license plate or revalidation
469 sticker contrary to the provisions of this subsection. This
470 section applies both to the annual renewal of a motor vehicle
471 registration and the replacement of the motor vehicle
472 registration or license plate, but does not apply to the
473 transfer of a registration of a motor vehicle sold by a motor
474 vehicle dealer licensed under this chapter, except for the
475 transfer of registrations which includes the annual renewals.
Page 19 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
476 This section does not affect the issuance of the title to a
477 motor vehicle, notwithstanding s. 319.23(8)(b).
478 Section 15. Paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of section
479 322.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
480 322.27 Authority of department to suspend or revoke driver
481 license or identification card.—
482 (3) There is established a point system for evaluation of
483 convictions of violations of motor vehicle laws or ordinances,
484 and violations of applicable provisions of s. 403.413(6)(b) when
485 such violations involve the use of motor vehicles, for the
486 determination of the continuing qualification of any person to
487 operate a motor vehicle. The department is authorized to suspend
488 the license of any person upon showing of its records or other
489 good and sufficient evidence that the licensee has been
490 convicted of violation of motor vehicle laws or ordinances, or
491 applicable provisions of s. 403.413(6)(b), amounting to 12 or
492 more points as determined by the point system. The suspension
493 shall be for a period of not more than 1 year.
494 (d) The point system shall have as its basic element a
495 graduated scale of points assigning relative values to
496 convictions of the following violations:
497 1. Reckless driving, willful and wanton—4 points.
498 2. Leaving the scene of a crash resulting in property
499 damage of more than $50—6 points.
500 3. Unlawful speed, or unlawful use of a wireless
Page 20 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
501 communications device, resulting in a crash—6 points.
502 4. Passing a stopped school bus:
503 a. Not causing or resulting in serious bodily injury to or
504 death of another—4 points.
505 b. Causing or resulting in serious bodily injury to or
506 death of another—6 points.
507 c. Points may not be imposed for a violation of passing a
508 stopped school bus as provided in s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b) when
509 enforced by a school bus infraction detection system pursuant to
510 s. 316.173. In addition, a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b)
511 when enforced by a school bus infraction detection system
512 pursuant to s. 316.173 may not be used for purposes of setting
513 motor vehicle insurance rates.
514 5. Unlawful speed:
515 a. Not in excess of 15 miles per hour of lawful or posted
516 speed—3 points.
517 b. In excess of 15 miles per hour of lawful or posted
518 speed—4 points.
519 c. Points may not be imposed for a violation of unlawful
520 speed as provided in s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 when enforced by
521 a traffic infraction enforcement officer pursuant to s.
522 316.1896. In addition, a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183
523 when enforced by a traffic infraction enforcement officer
524 pursuant to s. 316.1896 may not be used for purposes of setting
525 motor vehicle insurance rates.
Page 21 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
526 6. A violation of a traffic control signal device as
527 provided in s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1.—4 points.
528 However, points may not be imposed for a violation of s.
529 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. when a driver has failed to
530 stop at a traffic signal and when enforced by a traffic
531 infraction enforcement officer. In addition, a violation of s.
532 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. when a driver has failed to
533 stop at a traffic signal and when enforced by a traffic
534 infraction enforcement officer may not be used for purposes of
535 setting motor vehicle insurance rates.
536 7. Unlawfully driving a vehicle through a railroad-highway
537 grade crossing—6 points.
538 8. All other moving violations (including parking on a
539 highway outside the limits of a municipality)—3 points. However,
540 points may not be imposed for a violation of s. 316.2065(11);
541 and points may be imposed for a violation of s. 316.1001 only
542 when imposed by the court after a hearing pursuant to s.
543 318.14(5).
544 9. Any moving violation covered in this paragraph,
545 excluding unlawful speed and unlawful use of a wireless
546 communications device, resulting in a crash—4 points.
547 10. Any conviction under s. 403.413(6)(b)—3 points.
548 11. Any conviction under s. 316.0775(2)—4 points.
549 12. A moving violation covered in this paragraph which is
550 committed in conjunction with the unlawful use of a wireless
Page 22 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 521 2026
551 communications device within a school safety zone—2 points, in
552 addition to the points assigned for the moving violation.
553 Section 16. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 23 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb521-00